Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.460

Injunctions.

The department is hereby authorized to apply for, and the court authorized to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulations promulgated under this chapter, notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law. Any such injunction shall be issued without bond.

[ 1969 c 63 s 46.]